Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.091] ADVANCING EDUCATION ON REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH CONDITIONS AND WOMEN'S NATURAL CYCLE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Education. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of health shall integrate information about the root causes of infertility and reproductive health conditions, including restorative reproductive medicine, fertility awareness-based methods, and body literacy education that can be used to treat reproductive health conditions into existing public health programs, including: new text end new text begin (1) family planning; new text end new text begin (2) maternal and child health programs; and new text end new text begin (3) women's health initiatives. new text end new text begin (b) Existing health education materials and resources shall be updated to include information on restorative reproductive medicine. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner shall work with Title X funded facilities to integrate restorative reproductive medicine, fertility awareness-based methods, and body literacy education services into existing programs within 12 months of this Act's effective date. The department shall provide guidance and support to facilities in implementing the services, including: new text end new text begin (1) training for health care providers on restorative reproductive medicine, fertility awareness-based methods and body literacy education; and new text end new text begin (2) development of patient education materials on restorative reproductive medicine, fertility awareness-based methods, and body literacy education. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Fertility awareness-based methods" means modern, evidence-based methods of tracking the menstrual cycle through observable biological signs in a woman, including body temperature, cervical fluid, and hormone production in the reproductive system, including luteinizing hormone and estrogen. Fertility awareness-based methods include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) fertility educational and medical management; new text end new text begin (2) symptothermal method; new text end new text begin (3) Creighton model fertility care system; and new text end new text begin (4) Billings ovulation method. new text end new text begin (c) "Fertility education and medical management" means the program developed in collaboration with the Reproductive Health Research Institute for medical research, protocols, and medical training for health care professionals to enable the clinical application of research advances in reproductive endocrinology by providing education for women about their bodies, hormonal health, and medical support as appropriate. new text end new text begin (d) "Infertility" means a symptom of an underlying disease or condition within a person's body that makes successfully conceiving and carrying a child to term difficult or impossible, which is diagnosed after: new text end new text begin (1) twelve months of sexual intercourse without the use of a chemical, barrier, or other contraceptive method for women who are under thirty-five years of age; or new text end new text begin (2) six months of targeted sexual intercourse without the use of a chemical, barrier, or other contraceptive method for women who are under thirty-five years of age and older when conception should otherwise be possible. new text end new text begin (e) "Natural procreative technology" or "NaProTECHNOLOGY" means an approach to health care that monitors and maintains a woman's reproductive and gynecological health including laparoscopic gynecologic surgery to reconstruct the uterus, fallopian tubes, ovaries, and other organ structures to eliminate endometriosis and other reproductive health conditions. new text end new text begin (f) "Reproductive health condition" means a health condition that makes successfully conceiving a child difficult or impossible when conception should otherwise be possible including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) endometriosis; new text end new text begin (2) adenomyosis; new text end new text begin (3) polycystic ovary disease; new text end new text begin (4) uterine fibroids; new text end new text begin (5) blocked fallopian tubes; new text end new text begin (6) hormone imbalances; new text end new text begin (7) hyperprolactinemia; new text end new text begin (8) thyroid conditions; new text end new text begin (9) ovulation dysfunctions; new text end new text begin (10) male-factor infertility, including low sperm count, low sperm motility, low testosterone, and lifestyle and environmental factors; and new text end new text begin (11) other unspecified health conditions that make it difficult or impossible to successfully conceive a child where conception should otherwise be possible. new text end new text begin (g) "Restorative reproductive health" means a scientific approach to reproductive medicine that seeks to cooperate with or restore the normal physiology and anatomy of the human reproductive system, including without limitation: new text end new text begin (1) body literacy programs that incorporate science-based charting methods; new text end new text begin (2) teacher-led reproductive health education; new text end new text begin (3) restorative reproductive medicine; new text end new text begin (4) natural procreative technology; new text end new text begin (5) fertility awareness-based methods; and new text end new text begin (6) fertility education and medical management. new text end new text begin (h) "Restorative reproductive medicine" means any scientific approach to reproductive medicine that seeks to cooperate with or restore the normal physiology and anatomy of the human reproductive system without the use of methods that are inherently suppressive, circumventive, or destructive to natural human functions. The scientific approaches include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) ultrasounds; new text end new text begin (2) blood tests; new text end new text begin (3) hormone panels; new text end new text begin (4) laparoscopic and exploratory surgeries; new text end new text begin (5) examining the patient's overall health and lifestyle; new text end new text begin (6) elimination of environmental endocrine disruptors; new text end new text begin (7) assessment of the health and fertility of a patient's partner; new text end new text begin (8) natural procreative technology; new text end new text begin (9) fertility awareness-based methods; and new text end new text begin (10) fertility education and medical management. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end